Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
712A

FORFEITURE

Section

712A-1 Definitions

712A-2 Jurisdiction

712A-3 Venue

712A-4 Covered offenses

712A-5 Property subject to forfeiture; exemption

712A-5.5 Excessive forfeitures

712A-6 Seizure of property

712A-7 Powers and duties of law enforcement
officers and

agencies

712A-8 Notice of forfeiture proceedings

712A-9 Commencement of proceedings

712A-10 Administrative forfeiture

712A-11 Judicial forfeiture proceedings; general

712A-12 Judicial in rem forfeiture proceedings

712A-13 Judicial in personam forfeiture
proceedings

712A-14 Supplemental remedies

712A-15 Disposition of claims by court

712A-16 Disposition of property forfeited

712A-17 Limitation of actions

712A-18 Victim restitution

712A-19 Construction

712A-20 Short title

Note

L 2001, c 91, §4 purports to amend this chapter.

COMMENTARY ON CHAPTER 712A

Act 104, Session Laws 1996, repealed the sunset provision of
the Hawaii omnibus criminal forfeiture act to make the law permanent. The
legislature found that forfeitures served a public purpose of removing assets
that facilitated or were derived from illegal activity, and that the forfeited
assets or their proceeds were being used for, inter alia, administering the
forfeiture program and training and educating law enforcement personnel. The
legislature also found that forfeitures served as an "immediate deterrent"
against future illegal activity involving the forfeited assets or precluded
further enjoyment of the forfeited assets. The legislature believed that the
criminal forfeiture law was being appropriately applied to aid in the war
against drugs. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 2731, House Standing
Committee Report No. 409-96.

Case Notes

Hawaii legislature intended administrative forfeitures and
judicial in rem forfeiture proceedings under this chapter to be civil
proceedings. 83 H. 141, 925 P.2d 311 (1996).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next